Washington statutes.
RCW 43.12.075

Duty of attorney general—Commissioner may represent state.

It shall be the duty of the attorney general, to institute, or defend, any action or proceeding to which the state, or the commissioner or the board, is or may be a party, or in which the interests of the state are involved, in any court of this state, or any other state, or of the United States, or in any department of the United States, or before any board or tribunal, when requested so to do by the commissioner, or the board, or upon the attorney general's own initiative.

The commissioner is authorized to represent the state in any such action or proceeding relating to any public lands of the state.

[ 2003 c 334 s 431; 1959 c 257 s 40; 1927 c 255 s 194; RRS s 7797-194. Prior: 1909 c 223 s 7; 1897 c 89 s 65; 1895 c 178 s 100. Formerly RCW 79.01.736, 79.08.020.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.